California, session 20252026, SB586.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 436.1 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:436.1. An “off-highway electric motorcycle,” commonly referred to as an eMoto, is an off-highway motorcycle subject to identification under this code that meets all of the following requirements:(a) Is designed by the manufacturer for operation primarily off the highway.(b) Is powered by an electric motor for which a motor number is not required.(c) Has handlebars for steering control.(d) Has a straddle seat provided by the manufacturer.(e) Has two wheels.(f) Is not equipped with pedals from the manufacturer.SEC. 2. Section 38010 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:38010. (a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), a motor vehicle specified in subdivision (b) of Section 38012 that is not registered under this code because it is to be operated or used exclusively off the highways, except as provided in this division, shall display an identification plate or device issued by the department.(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following:(1) Motor vehicles specifically exempted from registration under this code, including, but not limited to, motor vehicles exempted pursuant to Sections 4006, 4010, 4012, 4013, 4015, 4018, and 4019.(2) Implements of husbandry.(3) Motor vehicles owned by the state, or any county, city, district, or political subdivision of the state, or the United States.(4) Motor vehicles owned or operated by, or operated under contract with a utility, whether privately or publicly owned, when used as specified in Section 22512.(5) Special construction equipment described in Section 565, regardless of whether those motor vehicles are used in connection with highway or railroad work.(6) A motor vehicle with a currently valid special permit issued under Section 38087.5 that is owned or operated by a nonresident of this state and the vehicle is not identified or registered in a foreign jurisdiction. For the purposes of this paragraph, a person who holds a valid driver’s license issued by a foreign jurisdiction is presumed to be a nonresident.(7) Commercial vehicles weighing more than 6,000 pounds unladen.(8) A motorcycle manufactured in the year 1942 or prior.(9) Four-wheeled motor vehicles operated solely in organized racing or competitive events upon a closed course when those events are conducted under the auspices of a recognized sanctioning body or by permit issued by the local governmental authority having jurisdiction.(10) A motor vehicle with a currently valid identification or registration permit issued by another state, if the other state recognizes an identification plate or device issued by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) as valid for use in that state.SEC. 3. Section 38012 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:38012. (a) As used in this division, “off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification” means a motor vehicle subject to subdivision (a) of Section 38010.(b) As used in this division, “off-highway motor vehicle” includes, but is not limited to, the following:(1) A motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, except for any motorcycle that is eligible for a special transportation identification device issued pursuant to Section 38088.(2) A snowmobile or other vehicle designed to travel over snow or ice, as defined in Section 557.(3) A motor vehicle commonly referred to as a sand buggy, dune buggy, or all-terrain vehicle.(4) A motor vehicle commonly referred to as a jeep.(5) A recreational off-highway vehicle as defined in Section 500.(6) An off-highway electric motorcycle as defined in Section 436.1.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.